Massachusetts, session 194th, H4647.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the trial court of the
commonwealth shall establish a sick leave bank for Amy Tanguay, an employee of the trial
court. Any employee of the trial court may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or
vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Amy Tanguay. If Amy Tanguay terminates
employment with the trial court or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time
in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the trial court paid leave bank. Sick leave bank days
shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the
establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the trial court.
of 1